Connecticut, session 2026, SB00336.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Department of Housing shall
2 conduct a study on the housing policies of the state. Such study shall
3 examine each housing program, the policy it was designed to address
4 and the effectiveness of such program. Not later than January 1, 2027,
5 the Commissioner of Housing shall report, in accordance with the
6 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
7 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
8 relating to housing.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The title was changed.
sSB336 / File No. 32 1

sSB336 File No. 32
HSG Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB336 / File No. 32 2

sSB336 File No. 32
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires the Department of Housing to study housing
policies and report on their findings, does not result in a fiscal impact to
the state as the agency has the expertise and capacity to meet the
requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sSB336 / File No. 32 3

sSB336 File No. 32
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 336
AN ACT CONCERNING HOUSING.